Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,115
Other payments; cumulative.

The amounts required to be paid by insurance companies, risk management pools, and self-insurers under sections 48-1,113 and 48-1,114 shall be in addition to any other amounts, either in taxes, assessments, or otherwise, required by any other law of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 21.